Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.526

Washington opportunity pathways account (as amended by 2023 c 475).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs in chapter 28A.710 RCW (charter schools), chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW (opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW 28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92 RCW (Washington college grant program), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to careers), chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), and chapter 43.216 RCW (early childhood education and assistance program). During the 2019-2021, 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the account may also be appropriated for public schools funded under chapters 28A.150 and 28A.715 RCW.

[2023 c 475 s 922; 2020 c 357 s 911; 2019 c 406 s 39; 2018 c 232 s 10; 2016 c 241 s 201; 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

PDFRCW 28B.76.526

Washington opportunity pathways account (as amended by 2023 c 475).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs in chapter 28A.710 RCW (charter schools), chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW (opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW 28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92 RCW (Washington college grant program), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to careers), chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), and chapter 43.216 RCW (early childhood education and assistance program). During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the account may also be appropriated for public schools funded under chapters 28A.150 and 28A.715 RCW.

[2023 c 475 s 1901; 2020 c 357 s 911; 2019 c 406 s 39; 2018 c 232 s 10; 2016 c 241 s 201; 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 28B.76.526 was amended twice during the 2023 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Effective date—2020 c 357: See note following RCW 43.79.545.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Short title—2018 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.117.010.

Effective date—2016 c 241: See RCW 28A.710.901.

Findings—Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 27: "The legislature finds that institutions of higher education are key to the future employment opportunities of Washington citizens and to the economic well-being of the state. The legislature finds that the recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers at institutions of higher education and the formation of research innovation teams will further enhance faculty recruitment and economic development. The legislature further finds that current financial aid and early childhood education programs are underfunded and subject to the unpredictability of the state budget. It is the intent of the legislature to direct lottery account moneys toward the Washington opportunity pathways account and that those funds stabilize and increase existing resources for the recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership zones and research teams, early childhood education, opportunity grants, educational opportunity grants, get ready for math and science scholarships, passport to college promise scholarships, college bound scholarships, the state work-study program, the state need grant, Washington scholars awards, the Washington award for vocational excellence, and Washington promise scholarships. It is also the intent of the legislature to continue funding the education construction fund by redirecting a portion of general state revenues to that fund." [2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1.]